src/fst/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language adverbs

LEXICON ADV_
:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV_DEGREE
+Deg:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV_INTERR
+Interr:        K   ;


LEXICON ADV_PARENTHETIC
+Parenthetic:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV_QNT
+Qnt: K ;

LEXICON ADV_SPAT
+Spat:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV_TEMP
+Temp:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV_TOT
+Tot: K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
