src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  --------
!! Adverbs in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are words that express time, place, degree, mode.

LEXICON Adverbs

bək̓ʷ+Adv:bək̓ʷ ADV_TOT "" ;
cay+Adv:cay ADV_DEGREE "" ;
cick̓ʷ+Adv:cick̓ʷ ADV_DEGREE "" ;
ck̓ʷaqid+Adv:ck̓ʷaqid ADV_TEMP "" ;
cugʷ+Adv:cugʷ ADV_DEGREE "" ;
cukʷ+Adv:cukʷ ADV_DEGREE "" ;
cəɬul̕+Adv:cəɬul̕ ADV_TEMP "" ;
daw̓+Adv:daw̓ ADV_TEMP "" ;
day̓+Adv:day̓ ADV_DEGREE "" ;
daʔxʷ+Adv:daʔxʷ ADV_TEMP "" ;
diʔəʔ+Adv:diʔəʔ ADV_SPAT "" ;
dxʷq̓ixʷ+Adv:dxʷq̓ixʷ ADV_SPAT "" ;
dxʷt̕aq̓t+Adv:dxʷt̕aq̓t ADV_SPAT "" ;
gʷaʔxʷ+Adv:gʷaʔxʷ ADV_TEMP "" ;
gʷəhaw̓ə+Adv:gʷəhaw̓ə ADV_PARENTHETIC "" ;
hagʷ+Adv:hagʷ ADV_TEMP "" ;
haʔkʷ+Adv:haʔkʷ ADV_TEMP "" ;
hikʷ+Adv:hikʷ ADV_DEGREE "" ;
hiqab+Adv:hiqab ADV_DEGREE "" ;
huy+Adv:huy ADV_TEMP "" ;
həlaʔab+Adv:həlaʔab ADV_ "" ;
laʔab+Adv:laʔab ADV_ "" ;
put+Adv:put ADV_ "" ;
qa+Adv:qa ADV_QNT "" ;
q̓ixʷ+Adv:q̓íxʷ ADV_ "" ;
siʔ+Adv:siʔ ADV_SPAT "" ;
tiiləb+Adv:tiiləb ADV_SPAT "" ;
til+Adv:til ADV_TEMP "" ;
tiləb+v1+Adv:tiləb ADV_SPAT "" ;
tiləb+v1+Adv:tiləb ADV_TEMP "" ;
tudiʔ+Adv:tudiʔ ADV_SPAT "" ;
tudukʷəɬdat+Adv:tudukʷəɬdat ADV_TEMP "" ;
tul̕al+Adv:tul̕al ADV_INTERR "" ;
tul̕čad+Adv:tul̕%^√čád ADV_INTERR "" ;
tul̕ʔal+Adv:tul̕ʔal ADV_SPAT "" ;
tux̌ʷ+Adv:tux̌ʷ ADV_PARENTHETIC "" ;
t̕aq̓t+Adv:t̕aq̓t ADV_SPAT "" ;
xʷuʔələʔ+Adv:xʷuʔələʔ ADV_PARENTHETIC "" ;
xʷɬub+Adv:xʷɬub ADV_PARENTHETIC "" ;
x̌ʷul̕+Adv:x̌ʷul̕ ADV_ "" ;
yaw̓+Adv:yaw̓ ADV_TEMP "" ;
čad+Adv:čad ADV_INTERR "" ;
ƛ̕al̕+Adv:ƛ̕al̕ ADV_ "" ;
ɬixʷdat+Adv:ɬixʷdat ADV_TEMP "" ;
ɬudukʷəɬdat+Adv:ɬudukʷəɬdat ADV_TEMP "" ;
ʔaɬ+Adv:ʔáɬ ADV_ "" ;
ʔəsx̌id+Adv:ʔəsx̌id ADV_INTERR "" ;
ʔəsčal+Adv:ʔəsčal ADV_INTERR "" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
